Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1010
Suits against governmental bodies; authorized.

The state, governmental agencies, and political subdivisions may be sued upon claims arising under the Age Discrimination in Employment Act in the same manner as provided by such act for suits against other employers.

Laws 1983, LB 424, § 4;

Laws 2007, LB265, § 21.